Georgia, session 2025_26, HB203.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 1 of Article 2 of Chapter 3 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to the Board of Regents, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as
follows:
"20-3-21.1.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term 'historically black college or university' means
an institution that meets the eligibility requirements of 34 C.F.R. Section 608.2 as of
January 1, 2025, and which is a unit of the University System of Georgia.
(b)(1) Beginning January 1, 2028, at least one at-large member of the board shall be a
graduate of a historically black college or university.
H. B. 203
- 1 -

LC 61 0023
(2) Beginning January 1, 2031, at least two at-large members of the board shall be
graduates of a historically black college or university."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 203
- 2 -